South Dakota, session 2026, SB196.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 10-6A-2 be AMENDED:
10-6A-2. Any person An individual making an application under the provisions of
this chapter is entitled to a real property tax assessment freeze upon the person's
individual's owner-occupied single-family dwelling if the person:
(1) Has a household income of less than fifty-five thousand dollars if the household is
a single-member household, or the person has a household income of less than
sixty-five eighty-five thousand dollars if the household is a multiple-member
household;
(2) Has been an owner of an owner-occupied single-family dwelling and a resident of
South Dakota for at least five years, unless the person has received the assessment
freeze in the previous year;
(3) Has resided for at least two hundred days of the previous calendar year in the
single-family dwelling; and
(4) Has established a base year.
The surviving spouse of a person who has previously qualified is entitled to the real
property tax assessment freeze if the surviving spouse meets the other conditions of this
chapter.
Beginning on January 1, 2026, 2027, the household income listed in subdivision
(1) of this section must increase annually by the index factor. The index factor is the
annual percentage change in the consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical
workers as computed by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department
of Labor for the year before the year immediately preceding the year of adjustment or the
annual percentage change in federal social security payments for the preceding year,
whichever is greater.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.